Utah statutes.
34A-6-302.   Citations issued by division -- Grounds -- Posting -- Limitation.

(1) (a)  If upon inspection or investigation, the division or its authorized representative believes that an employer has violated a requirement of Section 34A-6-201, of any standard, rule, or order issued under Section 34A-6-202, or any rules under this chapter, it shall with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer.

(b)  Each citation shall:

(i)  be in writing; and

(ii)  describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the provision of the chapter, standard, rule, or order alleged to have been violated.

(c)  The citation shall fix a reasonable time for the abatement of the violation.  In the case of a review proceeding initiated by the employer in good faith, not for the purpose of delay or avoidance of the penalties, the time for abatement begins to run on the date of the final order of the commission.

(d)  The commission may prescribe procedures for the issuance of a notice in lieu of a citation with respect to violations that have no direct or immediate relationship to safety or health.

(2)  Each citation issued under this section or a copy shall be prominently posted by the employer, as required by rule, at or near each place a violation referred to in the citation occurred.

(3)  A citation may not be issued under this section after the expiration of six months following the occurrence of any violation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

